South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3496.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-1-190. (A) Before a county enters into a fee in lieu of property taxes agreement, the county must consult with the other affected taxing entities regarding the effects of the agreement on the other entities. The county must provide projections for the amount of revenue expected to be distributed to each entity each year from the agreement, and the method by which the projections were calculated. (B) Each year a fee in lieu of property taxes agreement is in effect, the county shall provide a report to the other affected taxing entities of the total amount of revenue generated from the agreement, the amount of revenue distributed to each taxing entity, and the calculation used to determine each distribution. (C) In any year in which the county fails to distribute an affected taxing entity its correct distribution as provided by law, the Office of the State Treasurer shall withhold the county's State Aid to Subdivisions Act distribution until the correct amount is distributed. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----